Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.017

Code reviser may omit certain provisions of legislative acts from code; may omit annotations after ten years.

(1) The reviser may omit from the code all titles to acts, enacting and repealing clauses, preambles, declarations of emergency, severability, and validity and construction sections unless, in a particular instance, it may be necessary to retain such to preserve the full intent of the law. The omission of validity or construction sections is not intended to, nor shall it change, or be considered as changing, the effect to be given thereto in construing legislation of which such validity and construction sections were a part. Any section so omitted, other than repealing, emergency, severability, or validity provisions, shall be referred to or set forth as an annotation to the applicable sections of the act as codified.

(2) The reviser may remove annotations that have appeared in the published Revised Code of Washington for more than ten years, unless in a particular instance, it may be necessary to retain such to preserve the full intent of the law. Any annotations removed under this subsection shall be retained and available in the electronic copy of the Revised Code of Washington available on the code reviser website.

(3) Section captions, part headings, subheadings, tables of contents, and indexes appearing in legislative bills shall not be considered any part of the law, and the reviser may omit such provisions from the Revised Code of Washington and annotations unless, in a particular instance, it may be necessary to retain such to preserve the full intent of the law.

[ 2009 c 186 s 2; 1955 c 235 s 3; 1951 c 157 s 8.]